Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 1.1 Selection of Supreme Court Justices [Repealed.]

8-1.1-1 — 8-1.1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 155, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1994, ch. 42, § 2, effective upon ratification of a constitutional amendment to

R.I. Const., art. X, §§ 4

and 5. The constitutional amendments were ratified by a majority of the voters in the election held November 8, 1994.